Hawaii statutes.
§334-23 Money belonging to patients.
Whenever small amounts of cash come into the hands of the administrator of a
psychiatric facility, the administrator may, without seeking the appointment of
a guardian, deposit the money in a bank or other financial institution and from
time to time as the administrator may determine apply the same or any part
thereof for the benefit of the patient, provided that so long as a guardian is
not appointed, the administrator shall not apply any part of the cash for the maintenance
of the patient in the facility. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-23; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next